test/src/morphology/V-svaqrrw_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Verb - sva’rrõ: # Verb 52 'eng /est kaaluda/fin' - full paradigm
     sva’rrõ+V+Inf: sva’rrõ
     sva’rrõ+V+Ger: sva’rrõs
     sva’rrõ+V+Sup: sva’rrõm
     sva’rrõ+V+Sup+Ine: sva’rrõmõs
     sva’rrõ+V+Sup+Ela: sva’rrõmõst
     sva’rrõ+V+Sup+Tra: sva’rrõmõks
     sva’rrõ+V+Sup+Abe: sva’rrõmõt
     sva’rrõ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: sva’rrõb
     sva’rrõ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: sva’rrõt
     sva’rrõ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: sva’rrõbõd
     sva’rrõ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: sva’rriz
     sva’rrõ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: [sva’rr izt, sva’rr, iztõ]
     sva’rrõ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: [sva’rr izt, sva’rr, iztõ]
     sva’rrõ+V+Ind+ConNeg+Sg: sva’r
     sva’rrõ+V+Cond+Sg3: sva’rrõks
     sva’rrõ+V+Imprt+Sg2: sva’r
     sva’rrõ+V+Imprt+ConNeg+Sg2: sva’r
     sva’rrõ+V+Imprt+Pl2: sva’rrõgid
     sva’rrõ+V+Jus+Sg3: sva’rrõg
     sva’rrõ+V+Quo+Sg3: sva’rriji
     sva’rrõ+V+ActPrfPrc: sva’rrõn
     sva’rrõ+V+PssPrfPrc: sva’rdõd
